Hawaii, session 2026, GM1331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Act 62, Session Laws
of Hawaii 2023, established a new excise tax on electronic
smoking devices and e-liquids, requiring updates to tobacco
enforcement laws to ensure the State's enforcement authority
extends to these products.
The purpose of this Act is to update tobacco enforcement
laws to:
(1) Clarify that untaxed tobacco products are subject to
forfeiture as contraband, without regard to the
procedures set forth in chapter 712A, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, in the same manner as untaxed cigarettes;
and
(2) Confirm the authority of the department of taxation
and the department of the attorney general to inspect
and seize tobacco products, including electronic
smoking devices and e-liquids.
2026-2456 SB3076 CDl SMA.docx 1

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Chapter 245, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
”§245- Forfeiture. Any cigarette or tobacco product,
package of cigarettes or tobacco products, carton of cigarettes
or tobacco products, or container of cigarettes or tobacco
products unlawfully possessed, kept, stored, received, held,
owned, acquired, retained, transported, imported, or caused to
be imported, distributed, sold, or offered for sale in violation
of this part shall be forfeited as contraband pursuant to
chapter 712A. Any cigarette or tobacco product, package of
cigarettes or tobacco products, carton of cigarettes or tobacco
products, or container of cigarettes or tobacco products
forfeited as provided in this section shall be ordered
destroyed."
SECTION 3. Section 245-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (b) and (c) to read as follows:
"(b) The department and the attorney general may inspect
the operations, premises, and storage areas of any entity
engaged in the sale of cigarettes [-r] or tobacco products, or the
contents of a specific vending machine, during regular business
2026-2456 SB3076 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiMiinuiiiiiiiiiiiiHiin

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
hours. This inspection shall include inspection of all
statements, books, papers, and records in whatever format,
including electronic format, pertaining to the acquisition,
possession, transportation, sale, or use of packages of
cigarettes and tobacco products [other than cigarettco], to
verify the accuracy of the payment of taxes imposed by this
chapter, and of the contents of cartons and shipping or storage
containers to ascertain that all individual packages of
cigarettes have an affixed stamp of proper denomination as
required by this chapter. This inspection may also verify that
all stamps were produced under the authority of the department.
Every entity in possession of any books, papers, and records,
and the entity's agents and employees, are directed and required
to give the department and the attorney general the means,
facilities, and opportunities for the examinations.
(c) If the department or the attorney general has
reasonable cause to believe and does believe that cigarettes,
tobacco products, stamps, or counterfeit stamps are being
acquired, possessed, transported, kept, sold, or offered for
sale in violation of this chapter, the department or the
attorney general may investigate or search the vehicle or
2026-2456 SB3076 CDl SMA.docx
IlilllMMIIIIIIIIMIIIM

Page 4 3076
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D.2
C.D. 1
premises in which the cigarettes, tobacco products, stamps, or
counterfeit stamps are believed to be located. If cigarettes,
tobacco products, stamps, or counterfeit stamps are found in a
vehicle, premises, or vending machine in violation of this
chapter the cigarettes, tobacco products, vending machine,
vehicle, stamps, counterfeit stamps, or other tangible personal
property containing those cigarettes, tobacco products, stamps,
or counterfeit stamps and any books and records in possession of
the entity in control or possession of the cigarettes, tobacco
products, stamps, or counterfeit stamps may be seized by the
department or the attorney general and [e^fe] shall be subject to
forfeiture as provided in this chapter and chapter 712A."
SECTION 4. Section 712A-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows:
"(1) The following shall be subject to forfeiture:
(a) Property described in a statute authorizing
forfeiture;
(b) Property used or intended for use in the commission
of, attempt to commit, or conspiracy to commit a
covered offense, or that facilitated or assisted the
activity;
2026-2456 SB3076 GDI SMA.docx
iDiiiiiiiiMimniniinHi

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(c) Any firearm that is subject to forfeiture under any
other subsection of this section or that is carried
during, visible, or used in furtherance of the
commission, attempt to commit, or conspiracy to commit
a covered offense, or any firearm found in proximity
to contraband or to instrumentalities of an offense;
(d) Contraband [or untaxod oigarottoe- in- violatiofi of-
ehaptor- 245, ] that shall be seized and summarily
forfeited to the State without regard to the
procedures set forth in this chapter;
(e) Any proceeds or other property acquired, maintained,
or produced by means of or as a result of the
commission of the covered offense;
(f) Any property derived from any proceeds that were
obtained directly or indirectly from the commission of
a covered offense;
(g) Any interest in, security of, claim against, or
property or contractual right of any kind affording a
source of influence over any enterprise that has been
established, participated in, operated, controlled, or
conducted in order to commit a covered offense; and
2026-2456 SB3076 CDl SMA.docx
liiiliiliiiiiiiiiiiHiiinmii

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(h) All books, records, bank statements, accounting
records, microfilms, tapes, computer data, or other
data that are used, intended for use, or that
facilitated or assisted in the commission of a covered
offense, or that document the use of the proceeds of a
covered offense."
SECTION 5. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION ~I. This Act shall take effect on September 1,
2026.
2026-2456 SB3076 CDl SMA.docx 6
IHMiHIIIIIIIIIIIIIIHII

3076
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 10th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 3076, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
104-26

SB No. 3076, SD 1, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives